Massachusetts, session 194th, H4893.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 34 the following section:- 
Section 35. (a) For the purpose of this section, the following term shall have the 
following meaning: 
“Preventive behavioral health services”, short-term interventions in supportive group, 
individual, or family settings that cultivate coping skills and strategies for symptoms of 
depression, anxiety, and other social and emotional concerns, which may prevent the 
development of behavioral health conditions for members who are under 21 years old who have 
a positive behavioral health screening, or, in the case of an infant, a caregiver with a positive 
post-partum depression screening, even if the individual does not meet criteria for behavioral 
health diagnosis. 
(b)(1) Any coverage offered by the commission to an active or retired employee of the 
commonwealth under the group insurance commission shall provide coverage for no fewer than 

of 7 14 six sessions of preventive behavioral health services provided by a qualified licensed behavioral 
health clinician, or a non-licensed clinician or trainee under supervision, without requiring prior 
authorization. Coverage shall include individual, family and group sessions when delivered by a 
behavioral health clinician practicing in an integrated pediatric primary care setting and group 
sessions when delivered in community-based outpatient and school settings. Preventive 
behavioral health services shall be covered with no patient cost-sharing; provided, however, that 
cost-sharing shall be required if the applicable plan is governed by the Federal Internal Revenue 
Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a result of the prohibition on cost-sharing for this 
service. 
(2) The commission and its contracted carriers shall accept an alternative diagnosis code, 
including a Social Determinants of Health Z-code, as the primary diagnosis from eligible 
providers submitting claims for preventive behavioral health services. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting before 
section 47CCC the following section:- 
Section 47AAA. (a) For the purpose of this section, the following term shall have the 
following meaning: 
“Preventive behavioral health services”, short-term interventions in supportive group, 
individual, or family settings that cultivate coping skills and strategies for symptoms of 
depression, anxiety, and other social and emotional concerns, which may prevent the 
development of behavioral health conditions for members who are under 21 years old who have 
a positive behavioral health screening, or, in the case of an infant, a caregiver with a positive 

of 7 35 post-partum depression screening, even if the individual does not meet criteria for behavioral 
health diagnosis. 
(b)(1) Any blanket or general policy of insurance described in subdivision (A), (C), or 
(D) of section one hundred and ten which is issued or subsequently renewed by agreement 
between the insurer and the policyholder, within or without the commonwealth, during the 
period within which this premium is effective, or any policy of accident or sickness insurance as 
described in section one hundred and eight which provides hospital expense and surgical expense 
insurance and which is delivered or issued for delivery or subsequently renewed by agreement 
between the insurer and the policyholder in the commonwealth, during the period within which 
this provision is effective, or any employers' health and welfare fund which provides hospital 
expense and surgical expense benefits and which is issued or renewed to any person or group of 
persons in the commonwealth, during the period within which this provision is effective, shall 
provide coverage for no fewer than six sessions of preventive behavioral health services 
provided by a qualified licensed behavioral health clinician, or a non-licensed clinician or trainee 
under supervision, without requiring prior authorization. Coverage shall include individual, 
family and group sessions when delivered by a behavioral health clinician practicing in an 
integrated pediatric primary care setting and group sessions when delivered in community-based 
outpatient and school settings. Preventive behavioral health services shall be covered with no 
patient cost-sharing; provided, however, that cost-sharing shall be required if the applicable plan 
is governed by the Federal Internal Revenue Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a 
result of the prohibition on cost-sharing for this service. 

of 7 56  (2) Payers covered under this section shall accept an alternative diagnosis code, including 
a Social Determinants of Health Z-code, as the primary diagnosis from eligible providers 
submitting claims for preventive behavioral health services. 
SECTION 3. Chapter 176A of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 8DDD the following section:- 
Section 8EEE. (a) For the purpose of this section, the following term shall have the 
following meaning: 
“Preventive behavioral health services”, short-term interventions in supportive group, 
individual, or family settings that cultivate coping skills and strategies for symptoms of 
depression, anxiety, and other social and emotional concerns, which may prevent the 
development of behavioral health conditions for members who are under 21 years old who have 
a positive behavioral health screening, or, in the case of an infant, a caregiver with a positive 
post-partum depression screening, even if the individual does not meet criteria for behavioral 
health diagnosis. 
(b)(1) Any contract between a subscriber and a corporation subject to this chapter, 
pursuant to an individual or group hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed 
within or without the commonwealth shall provide coverage for no fewer than six sessions of 
preventive behavioral health services provided by a qualified licensed behavioral health 
clinician, or a non-licensed clinician or trainee under supervision, without requiring prior 
authorization. Coverage shall include individual, family and group sessions when delivered by a 
behavioral health clinician practicing in an integrated pediatric primary care setting and group 
sessions when delivered in community-based outpatient and school settings. Preventive 

of 7 78 behavioral health services shall be covered with no patient cost-sharing; provided, however, that 
cost-sharing shall be required if the applicable plan is governed by the Federal Internal Revenue 
Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a result of the prohibition on cost-sharing for this 
service. 
(2) Payers covered under this section shall accept an alternative diagnosis code, including 
a Social Determinants of Health Z-code, as the primary diagnosis from eligible providers 
submitting claims for preventive behavioral health services. 
SECTION 4. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 4DDD the following section:- 
Section 4EEE. (a) For the purpose of this section, the following term shall have the 
following meaning: 
“Preventive behavioral health services”, short-term interventions in supportive group, 
individual, or family settings that cultivate coping skills and strategies for symptoms of 
depression, anxiety, and other social and emotional concerns, which may prevent the 
development of behavioral health conditions for members who are under 21 years old who have 
a positive behavioral health screening, or, in the case of an infant, a caregiver with a positive 
post-partum depression screening, even if the individual does not meet criteria for behavioral 
health diagnosis. 
(b)(1) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service 
agreement that is delivered, issued or renewed within or without the commonwealth shall 
provide coverage for no fewer than six sessions of preventive behavioral health services 
provided by a qualified licensed behavioral health clinician, or a non-licensed clinician or trainee 

of 7 100 under supervision, without requiring prior authorization. Coverage shall include individual, 
101 family and group sessions when delivered by a behavioral health clinician practicing in an 
102 integrated pediatric primary care setting and group sessions when delivered in community-based 
103 outpatient and school settings. Preventive behavioral health services shall be covered with no 
104 patient cost-sharing; provided, however, that cost-sharing shall be required if the applicable plan 
105 is governed by the Federal Internal Revenue Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a 
106 result of the prohibition on cost-sharing for this service. 
107  (2) Payers covered under this section shall accept an alternative diagnosis code, including 
108 a Social Determinants of Health Z-code, as the primary diagnosis from eligible providers 
109 submitting claims for preventive behavioral health services. 
110  SECTION 5. Chapter 176G of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after 
111 section 4VV the following section:- 
112  Section 4WW. (a) For the purpose of this section, the following term shall have the 
113 following meaning: 
114  “Preventive behavioral health services”, short-term interventions in supportive group, 
115 individual, or family settings that cultivate coping skills and strategies for symptoms of 
116 depression, anxiety, and other social and emotional concerns, which may prevent the 
117 development of behavioral health conditions for members who are under 21 years old who have 
118 a positive behavioral health screening, or, in the case of an infant, a caregiver with a positive 
119 post-partum depression screening, even if the individual does not meet criteria for behavioral 
120 health diagnosis. 

of 7 121  (b)(1) Any individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or renewed 
122 within or without the commonwealth shall provide coverage for no fewer than six sessions of 
123 preventive behavioral health services provided by a qualified licensed behavioral health 
124 clinician, or a non-licensed clinician or trainee under supervision, without requiring prior 
125 authorization. Coverage shall include individual, family and group sessions when delivered by a 
126 behavioral health clinician practicing in an integrated pediatric primary care setting and group 
127 sessions when delivered in community-based outpatient and school settings. Preventive 
128 behavioral health services shall be covered with no patient cost-sharing; provided, however, that 
129 cost-sharing shall be required if the applicable plan is governed by the Federal Internal Revenue 
130 Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a result of the prohibition on cost-sharing for this 
131 service. 
132  (2) Payers covered under this section shall accept an alternative diagnosis code, including 
133 a Social Determinants of Health Z-code, as the primary diagnosis from eligible providers 
134 submitting claims for preventive behavioral health services. 
135  SECTION 6. The division of insurance, in consultation with the office of Medicaid, shall 
136 develop guidance to implement coverage of preventive behavioral health services.